apertium-lev.lev.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary> 
   
 <alphabet> اأإآبتثجحخدذرزسشصضطظعغفقكلمنهويىءؤئة </alphabet>
      <sdefs>
         <sdef n="n"/>
         <sdef n="sg"/>
         <sdef n="pl"/>
          <sdef n="pr"/>
         <sdef n="prn"/>
         <sdef n="det"/>
         <sdef n="p1"/>
         <sdef n="p2"/>
        <sdef n="p3"/> 

   	 <sdef n="m"/>
  	  <sdef n="f"/>
         <sdef n="mf"/>

      </sdefs>
   <pardefs>
         <pardef n="عيلة__n">
	         <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	         <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>
	  <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
     		  <e><p><l>أنا</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      		  <e><p><l>أحن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/>><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     		  <e><p><l>أنت</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     		  <e><p><l>أنتي</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   		  <e><p><l>أنتم</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!-- 
            <e><p><l>أنتن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
--> 
     		  <e><p><l>هو</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    		  <e><p><l>هي</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
 		  <e><p><l>هم</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!-- 
        <e><p><l>هن</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
--> 


    </pardef>
 </pardefs>
   <section id="main" type="standard">

   </section>
</dictionary>
